California statutes. Probate Code
======================================================================
  Probate Code
  State of California
======================================================================

Source: Official California Legislative Information
        https://downloads.leginfo.legislature.ca.gov/
Data:   pubinfo_2025.zip (2025-2026 Session)
Extracted: April 15, 2026


======================================================================



======================================================================

DIVISION 1. PRELIMINARY PROVISIONS AND DEFINITIONS [1. - 88.]



PART 1. PRELIMINARY PROVISIONS [1. - 13.]

1.

This code shall be known as the Probate Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2.

(a) A provision of this code, insofar as it is substantially the same as a previously existing provision relating to the same subject matter, shall be construed as a restatement and continuation thereof and not as a new enactment.

(b) A provision of this code, insofar as it is the same in substance as a provision of a uniform act, shall be so construed as to effectuate the general purpose to make uniform the law in those states which enact that provision.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “New law” means either of the following, as the case may be:

(A) The act that enacted this code.

(B) The act that makes a change in this code, whether effectuated by amendment, addition, or repeal of any provision of this code.

(2) “Old law” means the applicable law in effect before the operative date of the new law.

(3) “Operative date” means the operative date of the new law.

(b) This section governs the application of a new law except to the extent otherwise expressly provided in the new law.

(c) Subject to the limitations provided in this section, a new law applies on the operative date to all matters governed by the new law, regardless of whether an event occurred or circumstance existed before, on, or after the operative date, including, but not limited to, creation of a fiduciary relationship, death of a person, commencement of a proceeding, making of an order, or taking of an action.

(d) If a petition, account, report, inventory, appraisal, or other document or paper is filed before the operative date, the contents, execution, and notice thereof are governed by the old law and not by the new law; but any subsequent proceedings taken after the operative date concerning the petition, account, report, inventory, appraisal, or other document or paper, including an objection or response, a hearing, an order, or other matter relating thereto is governed by the new law and not by the old law.

(e) If an order is made before the operative date, including an order appointing a personal representative, guardian, conservator, trustee, probate referee, or any other fiduciary or officer, or any action on an order is taken before the operative date, the validity of the order or action is governed by the old law and not by the new law. Nothing in this subdivision precludes proceedings after the operative date to modify an order made, or alter a course of action commenced, before the operative date to the extent proceedings for modification of an order or alteration of a course of action of that type are otherwise provided by statute.

(f) No personal representative, guardian, conservator, trustee, probate referee, or any other fiduciary, officer, or person is liable for any action taken before the operative date that was proper at the time the action was taken, even though the action would be improper if taken on or after the operative date, and such a person has no duty, as a result of the enactment of the new law, to take any step to alter the course of action or its consequences.

(g) If the new law does not apply to a matter that occurred before the operative date, the old law continues to govern the matter notwithstanding its amendment or repeal by the new law.

(h) If a party shows, and the court determines, that application of a particular provision of the new law or of the old law in the manner required by this section or by the new law would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the proceedings or the rights of the parties or other interested persons in connection with an event that occurred or circumstance that existed before the operative date, the court may, notwithstanding this section or the new law, apply either the new law or the old law to the extent reasonably necessary to mitigate the substantial interference.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

4.

Division, part, chapter, article, and section headings do not in any manner affect the scope, meaning, or intent of the provisions of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5.

If a notice or other communication is required by this code to be mailed by registered mail, the mailing of the notice or other communication by certified mail is deemed to be sufficient compliance with the requirement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

6.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the general provisions and rules of construction in this part govern the construction of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

7.

Whenever a reference is made to any portion of this code or to any other law, the reference applies to all amendments and additions heretofore or hereafter made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

8.

Unless otherwise expressly stated:

(a) “Division” means a division of this code.

(b) “Part” means a part of the division in which that term occurs.

(c) “Chapter” means a chapter of the division or part, as the case may be, in which that term occurs.

(d) “Article” means an article of the chapter in which that term occurs.

(e) “Section” means a section of this code.

(f) “Subdivision” means a subdivision of the section in which that term occurs.

(g) “Paragraph” means a paragraph of the subdivision in which that term occurs.

(h) “Subparagraph” means a subparagraph of the paragraph in which that term occurs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9.

The present tense includes the past and future tenses, and the future, the present.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10.

The singular number includes the plural, and the plural, the singular.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11.

If any provision or clause of this code or application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the code which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this code are severable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

12.

“Shall” is mandatory and “may” is permissive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

13.

(a) The degree of kinship or consanguinity between two persons is determined by counting the number of generations separating those persons, pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c). Each generation is called a degree.

(b) Lineal kinship or consanguinity is the relationship between two persons, one of whom is a direct descendant of the other. The degree of kinship between those persons is determined by counting the generations separating the first person from the second person. In counting the generations, the first person is excluded and the second person is included. For example, parent and child are related in the first degree of lineal kinship or consanguinity, grandchild and grandparent are related in the second degree, and great-grandchild and great-grandparent are related in the third degree.

(c) Collateral kinship or consanguinity is the relationship between two people who spring from a common ancestor, but neither person is the direct descendent of the other. The degree of kinship is determined by counting the generations from the first person up to the common ancestor and from the common ancestor down to the second person. In counting the generations, the first person is excluded, the second person is included, and the common ancestor is counted only once. For example, siblings are related in the second degree of collateral kinship or consanguinity, an aunt or uncle and a niece or nephew are related in the third degree, and first cousins are related in the fourth degree.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 348, Sec. 4.   (SB 308)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. DEFINITIONS [20. - 88.]

20.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this part govern the construction of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 82, Sec. 1.   Effective June 30, 1991.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 31 of Ch. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

21.

“Account,” when used to mean a contract of deposit of funds between a depositor and a financial institution, includes a checking account, savings account, certificate of deposit, share account, mutual capital certificate, and other like arrangements.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22.

“Account in an insured credit union” means a share account in a credit union, either federally chartered or state licensed, that is insured under Title II of the Federal Credit Union Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1781, et seq.).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

23.

(a) “Account in an insured savings and loan association” means a savings account or mutual capital certificate of either of the following:

(1) A federal association.

(2) A savings association doing business in this state which is an “insured institution” as defined in Title IV of the National Housing Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1724, et seq.).

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Federal association” has the meaning given that term in subdivision (b) of Section 5102 of the Financial Code.

(2) “Mutual capital certificate” has the meaning given that term in Section 5111 of the Financial Code.

(3) “Savings account” has the meaning given that term in Section 5116 of the Financial Code.

(4) “Savings association” has the meaning given that term in subdivision (a) of Section 5102 of the Financial Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

24.

“Beneficiary” means a person to whom a donative transfer of property is made or that person’s successor in interest, and:

(a) As it relates to the intestate estate of a decedent, means an heir.

(b) As it relates to the testate estate of a decedent, means a devisee.

(c) As it relates to a trust, means a person who has any present or future interest, vested or contingent.

(d) As it relates to a charitable trust, includes any person entitled to enforce the trust.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

26.

“Child” means any individual entitled to take as a child under this code by intestate succession from the parent whose relationship is involved.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

28.

“Community property” means:

(a) Community property heretofore or hereafter acquired during marriage by a married person while domiciled in this state.

(b) All personal property wherever situated, and all real property situated in this state, heretofore or hereafter acquired during the marriage by a married person while domiciled elsewhere, that is community property, or a substantially equivalent type of marital property, under the laws of the place where the acquiring spouse was domiciled at the time of its acquisition.

(c) All personal property wherever situated, and all real property situated in this state, heretofore or hereafter acquired during the marriage by a married person in exchange for real or personal property, wherever situated, that is community property, or a substantially equivalent type of marital property, under the laws of the place where the acquiring spouse was domiciled at the time the property so exchanged was acquired.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

29.

“Conservatee” includes a limited conservatee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

30.

“Conservator” includes a limited conservator.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

32.

“Devise,” when used as a noun, means a disposition of real or personal property by will, and, when used as a verb, means to dispose of real or personal property by will.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

34.

(a) “Devisee” means any person designated in a will to receive a devise.

(b) In the case of a devise to an existing trust or trustee, or to a trustee on trust described by will, the trust or trustee is the devisee and the beneficiaries are not devisees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

36.

“Dissolution of marriage” includes divorce.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

37.

(a) “Domestic partner” means one of two persons who have filed a Declaration of Domestic Partnership with the Secretary of State pursuant to Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 297) of the Family Code, provided that the domestic partnership has not been terminated pursuant to Section 299 of the Family Code.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 299 of the Family Code, if a domestic partnership is terminated by the death of one of the parties and Notice of Termination was not filed by either party prior to the date of death of the decedent, the domestic partner who survives the deceased is a surviving domestic partner, and shall be entitled to the rights of a surviving domestic partner as provided in this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

38.

“Family allowance” means an allowance provided for in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6540) of Part 3 of Division 6.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

39.

“Fiduciary” means personal representative, trustee, guardian, conservator, attorney-in-fact under a power of attorney, custodian under the California Uniform Transfer To Minors Act (Part 9 (commencing with Section 3900) of Division 4), or other legal representative subject to this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 724, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

40.

“Financial institution” means a state or national bank, state or federal savings and loan association or credit union, or like organization.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

42.

“General personal representative” is defined in subdivision (b) of Section 58.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

44.

“Heir” means any person, including the surviving spouse, who is entitled to take property of the decedent by intestate succession under this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

45.

“Instrument” means a will, a document establishing or modifying a trust, a deed, or any other writing that designates a beneficiary or makes a donative transfer of property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 56, Sec. 1.   (SB 308)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

46.

“Insured account in a financial institution” means an account in a bank, an account in an insured credit union, and an account in an insured savings and loan association, to the extent that the account is insured.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

48.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), “interested person” includes any of the following:

(1) An heir, devisee, child, spouse, creditor, beneficiary, and any other person having a property right in or claim against a trust estate or the estate of a decedent which may be affected by the proceeding.

(2) Any person having priority for appointment as personal representative.

(3) A fiduciary representing an interested person.

(b) The meaning of “interested person” as it relates to particular persons may vary from time to time and shall be determined according to the particular purposes of, and matter involved in, any proceeding.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

50.

“Issue” of a person means all his or her lineal descendants of all generations, with the relationship of parent and child at each generation being determined by the definitions of child and parent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

52.

“Letters”:

(a) As it relates to a personal representative, means letters testamentary, letters of administration, letters of administration with the will annexed, or letters of special administration.

(b) As it relates to a guardian or conservator, means letters of guardianship or conservatorship or temporary guardianship or conservatorship.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

54.

“Parent” means any individual entitled to take as a parent under this code by intestate succession from the child whose relationship is involved.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

55.

“Pay-on-death account” or “P.O.D. account” is defined in Section 5140.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

56.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, or other entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 202.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

58.

(a) “Personal representative” means executor, administrator, administrator with the will annexed, special administrator, successor personal representative, public administrator acting pursuant to Section 7660, or a person who performs substantially the same function under the law of another jurisdiction governing the person’s status.

(b) “General personal representative” excludes a special administrator unless the special administrator has the powers, duties, and obligations of a general personal representative under Section 8545.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 888, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

59.

“Predeceased spouse” means a person who died before the decedent while married to the decedent, except that the term does not include any of the following:

(a) A person who obtains or consents to a final decree or judgment of dissolution of marriage from the decedent or a final decree or judgment of annulment of their marriage, which decree or judgment is not recognized as valid in this state, unless they (1) subsequently participate in a marriage ceremony purporting to marry each to the other or (2) subsequently live together as spouses.

(b) A person who, following a decree or judgment of dissolution or annulment of marriage obtained by the
 decedent, participates in a marriage ceremony to a third person.

(c) A person who was a party to a valid proceeding concluded by an order purporting to terminate all marital property rights.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 76.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

60.

“Probate homestead” means a homestead provided for in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6520) of Part 3 of Division 6.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

60.1.

(a) “Professional fiduciary” means a person who is a professional fiduciary as defined under subdivision (f) of Section 6501 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) On and after January 1, 2009, no person shall act or hold himself or herself out to the public as a professional fiduciary unless he or she is licensed as a professional fiduciary under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

62.

“Property” means anything that may be the subject of ownership and includes both real and personal property and any interest therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

66.

“Quasi-community property” means the following property, other than community property as defined in Section 28:

(a) All personal property wherever situated, and all real property situated in this state, heretofore or hereafter acquired by a decedent while domiciled elsewhere that would have been the community property of the decedent and the surviving spouse if the decedent had been domiciled in this state at the time of its acquisition.

(b) All personal property wherever situated, and all real property situated in this state, heretofore or hereafter acquired in exchange for real or personal property, wherever situated, that would have been the community property of the decedent and the surviving spouse if the decedent had been domiciled in this state at the time the property so exchanged was acquired.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

68.

“Real property” includes a leasehold interest in real property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

69.

“Revocable transfer on death deed” or “revocable TOD deed” means a revocable transfer on death deed as described in Section 5614.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 293, Sec. 3.   (AB 139)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

70.

“Security” includes any note, stock, treasury stock, bond, debenture, evidence of indebtedness, certificate of interest or participation in an oil, gas, or mining title or lease or in payments out of production under such a title or lease, collateral trust certificate, transferable share, voting trust certificate or, in general, any interest or instrument commonly known as a security, or any certificate of interest or participation, any temporary or interim certificate, receipt, or certificate of deposit for, or any warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase, any of the foregoing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

72.

“Spouse” includes domestic partner, as defined in Section 37 of this code, as required by Section 297.5 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 77.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

74.

“State” includes any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and any territory or possession subject to the legislative authority of the United States.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

76.

A “subscribing witness” to a will means a witness who signs the will as provided in Section 6110.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

78.

“Surviving spouse” does not include any of the following:

(a) A person whose marriage to, or registered domestic partnership with, the decedent has been dissolved or annulled, unless, by virtue of a subsequent marriage or registered domestic partnership, the person is married to, or in a registered domestic partnership with, the decedent at the time of death.

(b) A person who obtains or consents to a final decree or judgment of dissolution of marriage or termination of registered domestic partnership from the decedent or a final decree or judgment of annulment of their marriage or termination of registered domestic partnership, which decree or
 judgment is not recognized as valid in this state, unless they (1) subsequently participate in a marriage ceremony purporting to marry each to the other or (2) subsequently live together as spouses.

(c) A person who, following a decree or judgment of dissolution or annulment of marriage or registered domestic partnership obtained by the decedent, participates in a marriage ceremony with a third person.

(d) A person who was a party to a valid proceeding concluded by an order purporting to terminate all marital or registered domestic partnership property rights.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 78.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

80.

“Totten trust account” means an account in the name of one or more parties as trustee for one or more beneficiaries where the relationship is established by the form of the account and the deposit agreement with the financial institution and there is no subject of the trust other than the sums on deposit in the account. In a Totten trust account, it is not essential that payment to the beneficiary be mentioned in the deposit agreement. A Totten trust account does not include (1) a regular trust account under a testamentary trust or a trust agreement which has significance apart from the account or (2) a fiduciary account arising from a fiduciary relation such as attorney-client.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

81.

“Transferor” means the testator, settlor, grantor, owner, or other person who executes an instrument.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

81.5.

“Transferee” means the beneficiary, donee, or other recipient of an interest transferred by an instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 806, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

82.

(a) “Trust” includes the following:

(1) An express trust, private or charitable, with additions thereto, wherever and however created.

(2) A trust created or determined by a judgment or decree under which the trust is to be administered in the manner of an express trust.

(b) “Trust” excludes the following:

(1) Constructive trusts, other than those described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), and resulting trusts.

(2) Guardianships and conservatorships.

(3) Personal representatives.

(4) Totten trust accounts.

(5) Custodial arrangements pursuant to the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act or the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act of any state.

(6) Business trusts that are taxed as partnerships or corporations.

(7) Investment trusts subject to regulation under the laws of this state or any other jurisdiction.

(8) Common trust funds.

(9) Voting trusts.

(10) Security arrangements.

(11) Transfers in trust for purpose of suit or enforcement of a claim or right.

(12) Liquidation trusts.

(13) Trusts for the primary purpose of paying debts, dividends, interest, salaries, wages, profits, pensions, or employee benefits of any kind.

(14) Any arrangement under which a person is nominee or escrowee for another.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

83.

“Trust company” means an entity that has qualified to engage in and conduct a trust business in this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

84.

“Trustee” includes an original, additional, or successor trustee, whether or not appointed or confirmed by a court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

86.

“Undue influence” has the same meaning as defined in Section 15610.70 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. It is the intent of the Legislature that this section supplement the common law meaning of undue influence without superseding or interfering with the operation of that law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 668, Sec. 1.   (AB 140)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

88.

“Will” includes codicil and any testamentary instrument which merely appoints an executor or revokes or revises another will.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 2. GENERAL PROVISIONS [100. - 890.]



PART 1. EFFECT OF DEATH OF MARRIED PERSON ON COMMUNITY AND QUASI-COMMUNITY PROPERTY [100. - 105.]

100.

(a) Upon the death of a person who is married or in a registered domestic partnership, one-half of the community property belongs to the surviving spouse and the other one-half belongs to the decedent.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), spouses may agree in writing to divide their community property on the basis of a non pro rata division of the aggregate value of the community property or on the basis of a division of each individual item or asset of community property, or partly on each basis. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require this written agreement in order to permit or recognize a non pro rata division of community
 property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 79.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

101.

(a) Upon the death of a person who is married or in a registered domestic partnership, and is domiciled in this state, one-half of the decedent’s quasi-community property belongs to the surviving spouse and the other one-half belongs to the decedent.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), spouses may agree in writing to divide their quasi-community property on the basis of a non pro rata division of the aggregate value of the quasi-community property, or on the basis of a division of each individual item or asset of quasi-community property, or partly on each basis. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require this written agreement in order to permit or recognize a non pro
 rata division of quasi-community property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 80.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

102.

(a) The decedent’s surviving spouse may require the transferee of property in which the surviving spouse had an expectancy under Section 101 at the time of the transfer to restore to the decedent’s estate one-half of the property if the transferee retains the property or, if not, one-half of its proceeds or, if none, one-half of its value at the time of transfer, if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The decedent died domiciled in this state.

(2) The decedent made a transfer of the property
 to a person other than the surviving spouse without receiving in exchange a consideration of substantial value and without the written consent or joinder of the surviving spouse.

(3) The transfer is any of the following types:

(A) A transfer under which the decedent retained at the time of death the possession or enjoyment of, or the right to income from, the property.

(B) A transfer to the extent that the decedent retained at the time of death a power, either alone or in conjunction with any other person, to revoke or to consume, invade, or dispose of the principal for the decedent’s own benefit.

(C) A transfer whereby property is held at the time of the decedent’s death by the decedent and another with right of survivorship.

(b) Nothing in this section requires a transferee to restore to the decedent’s estate any life insurance, accident insurance, joint annuity, or pension payable to a person other than the surviving spouse.

(c) All property restored to the decedent’s estate under this section belongs to the surviving spouse pursuant to Section 101 as though the transfer had not been made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

103.

Except as provided by Section 224, if spouses die leaving community or quasi-community property and it cannot be established by clear and convincing evidence that one spouse survived the other:

(a) One-half of the community property and one-half of the quasi-community property shall be administered or distributed, or otherwise dealt with, as if one spouse had survived and as if that one-half belonged to that spouse.

(b) The other one-half of the community property and the other one-half of the quasi-community property shall be administered or distributed, or otherwise dealt with, as if the other spouse had survived and as if that one-half
 belonged to that spouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 81.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

104.

Notwithstanding Section 100, community property held in a revocable trust described in Section 761 of the Family Code is governed by the provisions, if any, in the trust for disposition in the event of death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 119.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

104.5.

Transfer of community and quasi-community property to a revocable trust shall be presumed to be an agreement, pursuant to Sections 100 and 101, that those assets retain their character in the aggregate for purposes of any division provided by the trust. This section shall apply to all transfers prior to, on, or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 263, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

105.

This part does not apply where the decedent died before January 1, 1985, and the law applicable prior to January 1, 1985, continues to apply where the decedent died before January 1, 1985.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. SURVIVING SPOUSE'S RIGHT IN CALIFORNIA REAL PROPERTY OF NONDOMICILIARY DECEDENT [120. - 120.]

120.

If a married person dies not domiciled in this state and leaves a valid will disposing of real property in this state which is not the community property of the decedent and the surviving spouse, the surviving spouse has the same right to elect to take a portion of or interest in such property against the will of the decedent as though the property were located in the decedent’s domicile at death.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. CONTRACTUAL ARRANGEMENTS RELATING TO RIGHTS AT DEATH [140. - 147.]



  CHAPTER 1. Surviving Spouse’s Waiver of Rights [140. - 147.]

140.

As used in this chapter, “waiver” means a waiver by the surviving spouse of any of the rights listed in subdivision (a) of Section 141, whether signed before or during marriage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

141.

(a) The right of a surviving spouse to any of the following may be waived in whole or in part by a waiver under this chapter:

(1) Property that would pass from the decedent by intestate succession.

(2) Property that would pass from the decedent by testamentary disposition in a will executed before the waiver.

(3) A probate homestead.

(4) The right to have exempt property set aside.

(5) Family allowance.

(6) The right to have an estate set aside under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6600) of Part 3 of Division 6.

(7) The right to elect to take community or quasi-community property against the decedent’s will.

(8) The right to take the statutory share of an omitted spouse.

(9) The right to be appointed as the personal representative of the decedent’s estate.

(10) An interest in property that is the subject of a nonprobate transfer on death under Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of
 Division 5.

(b) Nothing in this chapter affects or limits the waiver or manner of waiver of rights other than those referred to in subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, the right to property that would pass from the decedent to the surviving spouse by nonprobate transfer upon the death of the decedent, such as the survivorship interest under a joint tenancy, a Totten trust account, or a pay-on-death account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 51, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

142.

(a) A waiver under this chapter shall be in writing and shall be signed by the surviving spouse.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), a waiver under this chapter is enforceable only if it satisfies the requirements of subdivision (a) and is enforceable under either Section 143 or Section 144.

(c) Enforcement of the waiver against the surviving spouse is subject to the same defenses as enforcement of a contract, except that:

(1) Lack of
 consideration is not a defense to enforcement of the waiver.

(2) A minor intending to marry may make a waiver under this chapter as if married, but the waiver becomes effective only upon the marriage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

143.

(a) Subject to Section 142, a waiver is enforceable under this section unless the surviving spouse proves either of the following:

(1) A fair and reasonable disclosure of the property or financial obligations of the decedent was not provided to the surviving spouse prior to the signing of the waiver unless the surviving spouse waived such a fair and reasonable disclosure after advice by independent legal counsel.

(2) The surviving spouse was not represented by independent legal counsel at the time of signing of the waiver.

(b) Subdivision (b) of Section 721 of the Family Code does not apply if the waiver is enforceable under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 120.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

144.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), subject to Section 142, a waiver is enforceable under this section if the court determines either of the following:

(1) The waiver at the time of signing made a fair and reasonable disposition of the rights of the surviving spouse.

(2) The surviving spouse had, or reasonably should have had, an adequate knowledge of the property and financial
 obligations of the decedent and the decedent did not violate the duty imposed by subdivision (b) of Section 721 of the Family Code.

(b) If, after considering all relevant facts and circumstances, the court finds that enforcement of the waiver pursuant to subdivision (a) would be unconscionable under the circumstances existing at the time enforcement is sought, the court may refuse to enforce the waiver, enforce the remainder of the waiver without the unconscionable provisions, or limit the application of the unconscionable provisions to avoid an unconscionable result.

(c) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), subdivision (b) of Section 721 of the Family Code does not apply if the waiver is enforceable under this section.
